Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 34 Responsibility of Owners of Rental Vehicles

31-34-1.
Proof of financial responsibility required.

It shall be unlawful for the owner of any motor vehicle or truck engaged in the business of renting motor vehicles or trucks without drivers to rent a motor vehicle without a driver otherwise than as a part of a bona fide transaction involving the sale of the motor vehicle or truck, unless the owner has previously notified the division of motor vehicles of the intention to so rent the vehicle and has given proof of financial responsibility, in the following amounts:

Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for property damage;

Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for injury or death sustained by one person;

Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for all personal injuries or deaths resulting from one accident.

The division of motor vehicles shall not register the vehicle unless and until the owner gives proof of financial responsibility as provided in this chapter. The division of motor vehicles shall cancel the registration of any motor vehicle or truck rented without a driver whenever the division of motor vehicles ascertains that the owner has failed or is unable to give and maintain proof of financial responsibility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 20, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-34-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

31-34-2.
Maintenance of policies.

The owner shall maintain the policy or policies or provide proof of financial responsibility or self-insurance during all times that the owner is engaged in the business of renting any motor vehicle without a driver.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 20, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-34-2

; P.L. 1998, ch. 339, § 1.

31-34-2.1.
Self-insurers.

Any person or company in whose name more than four hundred (400) vehicles are registered in this state may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the department of business regulation as provided in subsection (b).

Upon the application of the person or company, the department of business regulation may issue a certificate of self-insurance at its discretion if it is satisfied that the person or company has and will have the ability to pay any judgment obtained against the person or company. The certificate may be issued authorizing a person or company to act as a self-insurer for either property damage or bodily injury, or both.

Upon not less than five (5) days’ notice and a hearing pursuant to notice, the department of business regulation upon reasonable grounds may cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Failure to pay any judgment within thirty (30) days after the judgment has become final constitutes a reasonable ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance.

Entities applying to or previously authorized to permissibly self-insure are subject to the jurisdiction of the department of business regulation. The department of business regulation is authorized to promulgate and enforce rules and regulations that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section including, but not limited to:

Obtaining and reviewing financial statements and related information necessary to ascertain the applicant’s ability to self-insure.

Apportioning the cost of review to the applicant in a manner similar to that utilized to charge insurance companies for review and analysis of their financial statements.

Imposing and enforcing upon entities authorized to permissibly self-insure any and all claims handling and settlement practices required of insurers in the settlement of claims.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 339, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 29, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 36, § 2.

31-34-3.
Operation by person other than lessee.

Whenever the owner of a motor vehicle rents a vehicle without a driver to another it shall be unlawful for the lessee to permit any other person to operate the vehicle without the permission of the owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 20, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-34-3

.

31-34-4.
Liability of owner for negligence of operator.

Any owner of a for-hire motor vehicle or truck who has given proof of financial responsibility under this chapter or who in violation of this chapter has failed to give proof of financial responsibility, shall be jointly and severally liable with any person operating the vehicle for any damages caused by the negligence of any person operating the vehicle by or with the permission of the owner. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an owner who has furnished proof of financial responsibility or any person operating the vehicle from making defense in an action upon the ground of contributory negligence to the extent to which the defense is allowed in other cases.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, or any provisions contained under this title to the contrary, the valid and collectible liability insurance or self-insurance providing coverage or liability protection for third-party liability claims arising out of the operation of the rental vehicle shall be primary for the lessor or any person operating the motor vehicle, with the express permission of the lessor unless otherwise stated in at least ten-point (10) type on the face of the rental agreement. That insurance or self-insurance is primary only up to the limits required under §

31-47-2(13)(i)(A)

.

“Lessor” includes any entity in the business of renting motor vehicles pursuant to a written rental agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 20, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-34-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 115, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 117, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 219, § 6; P.L. 2004, ch. 224, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 137, § 6; P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 6, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 6, effective July 14, 2021.

31-34-5.
Failure to comply.

The division of motor vehicles shall cancel the registration of any motor vehicle rented without a driver whenever the division of motor vehicles ascertains that the owner has failed or is unable to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 20, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-34-5

.

31-34-6.
Violations

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 20, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-34-6

; P.L. 2021, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

31-34-7.
Notification to customer regarding insurance coverage.

Whenever any car rental agency offers a collision damage waiver on the vehicle at an additional cost, it shall notify the lessee by providing the following language, (in ten (10) point type) in all rental agreements:

“Notice: This contract offers, for an additional charge, a collision damage waiver to cover your responsibility for damage to the vehicle. Before deciding whether to purchase the collision damage waiver, you may wish to determine whether your own automobile insurance affords you coverage for damage to the rental vehicle and the amount of the deductible under your own insurance coverage. The purchase of collision damage waiver is not mandatory under this contract.

“Read the collision damage waiver disclosure provision contained in this rental agreement before signing this agreement.”

The following uniform collision damage waiver provision shall be contained in every rental agreement:

Notice About Liability for Damage to the Rental Car The State of Rhode Island requires us to provide the following information about your liability for damage to the rental car and the purchase of a damage waiver. Insurance or Credit Card Coverage Liability for any damage to the rental vehicle may be covered by your personal insurance policy or credit agreement. Check your insurance policy or credit card agreement about coverage. Damage Waiver Coverage A damage waiver is not insurance coverage. You do not have to purchase the Collision Damage Waiver. You can decline it. If you purchase a damage waiver, we will waive our right to hold you or any authorized driver liable for damage. Even if you buy the damage waiver, you and any authorized driver will remain liable for damage if any of the following apply: (1) Damage or loss caused intentionally, willfully or wantonly by an authorized driver; (2) Damage or loss occurring while an authorized driver operates the rental vehicle while legally intoxicated or under the influence of any illegal drug or chemical as defined or determined under the law of the state in which the damage occurred; (3) Damage or loss caused while an authorized driver is engaging in any speed contest; (4) Damage or loss caused while an authorized driver is using the vehicle to push or tow anything or using the vehicle to carry persons or property for hire, unless expressly authorized in the rental agreement; (5) Damage or loss incurred while an authorized driver is driving outside the United States or Canada, or, if state restrictions are imposed by the rental agreement if such damage or loss is incurred outside of those states where operation of the vehicle is expressly authorized in the rental agreement; (6) Damage or loss incurred while the vehicle is driven, with the renter's permission or accession, by anyone other than an authorized driver; (7) Damage or loss incurred after the private passenger automobile was rented or an authorized driver was approved as a result of fraudulent information provided to the rental company; (8) Damage or loss incurred as a result of commission of a felony by an authorized driver; and (9) Damage or loss incurred if the vehicle is stolen and the renter or authorized driver fails to return the original ignition key, fails to file a police report within seventy-two (72) hours of discovering the theft, or fails to cooperate with the rental agency, police or other authorities in all matters connected with the investigation.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 100, § 1.

31-34-8.
Basis of charges.

Every automobile rental company shall compute rental charges, with the exception of rental charges for temporary replacement vehicles after an accident, based solely on a twenty-four (24) hour period, rather than on a calendar day basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 510, § 1.

31-34-9.
Vehicles with salvage title.

No rental company shall utilize any vehicle with a salvage title as a rental vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 305, § 1.